lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/j.twolc
Alphabet

a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ä ö å
t2:t
%>:0
%^WG:0 %^A:ä %^O:ö %^U:y
;

Sets
Vow = a e o u i y ä ö å ;
Back = a o u å ;
Front = ä ö y ;
Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p r s t v w x z ;
Nonroundhigh = a e i o ä ö å  ;

! 3) Morfofonologiija = phonology.twolc

Rules

! Cx, Cy = konsonatntavariabela
! Vx, Vy = vokálavariábela (ax + by + c = ...)

"p:0"
p:0 <=> Vow p _ Vow %^WG: ; ! kappo : kapon

"p:v"
p:v <=> Vow _ Vow %^WG: ; ! kapu : kavun

"p:m"
p:m <=> Vow m _ Vow %^WG: ;


"t:0"
t:0 <=> Vow t _ Vow %^WG: ; ! katto : katon

"t:d"
t:d <=> Vow _ Vow %^WG: ; ! katu : kadun

"t:n"
t:n <=> Vow n _ Vow %^WG: ;


"k:0"
k:0 <=> Nonroundhigh (k) _ Nonroundhigh %^WG: ; ! kakko : kakon
 
"k:v"
k:v <=> [u|y] _ [u|y] %^WG: ; 

"k:g"
k:g <=> Vow n _ Vow %^WG: ;

"Vokaalisointu"
Vx:Vy <=> Back ?*  _ ;
      where Vx in ( %^A %^O %^U )
            Vy in (   a   o   u )
	    matched ;
